District of Columbia statutes.
38-905

John A. Chamberlain Vocational School.

The new school building built to replace the Lenox Vocational School shall, when occupied, be known as the John A. Chamberlain Vocational School.

July 15, 1939, 53 Stat. 1016, ch. 281, § 1
1981 Ed., § 31-2205.
1973 Ed., § 31-1107.